ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.aff
# rule/flag 6751 (affects 12554 words, has 92 subrules):
flag s:
	A	>	BKI
	I	>	D
	T	>	ISID
	T	>	ISIDKI
	A	>	KSIDKI
	A	>	KSIMEGI
	A	>	KSINGI
	A	>	KSITEGI
	I	>	ME
	A	>	MEGI
	I	>	N
	A	>	NGI
	E	>	S
	S	>	SE
	E	>	SIME
	E	>	SIMEGI
	E	>	SIN
	E	>	SINGI
	E	>	SITE
	E	>	SITEGI
	E	>	SKI
	I	>	TE
	U D	>	-D,M
	U D	>	-D,MAD
	U D	>	-D,MADKI
	U D	>	-D,MAGA
	U D	>	-D,MAGAGI
	U D	>	-D,MAID
	U D	>	-D,MAIDKI
	U D	>	-D,MAIGA
	U D	>	-D,MAIGAGI
	U D	>	-D,MAIKS
	U D	>	-D,MAIKSKI
	U D	>	-D,MAIL
	U D	>	-D,MAILE
	U D	>	-D,MAILEGI
	U D	>	-D,MAILGI
	U D	>	-D,MAILT
	U D	>	-D,MAILTKI
	U D	>	-D,MAINA
	U D	>	-D,MAINAGI
	U D	>	-D,MAINI
	U D	>	-D,MAINIGI
	U D	>	-D,MAIS
	U D	>	-D,MAISKI
	U D	>	-D,MAISSE
	U D	>	-D,MAISSEGI
	U D	>	-D,MAIST
	U D	>	-D,MAISTKI
	U D	>	-D,MAITA
	U D	>	-D,MAITAGI
	U D	>	-D,MAL
	U D	>	-D,MALE
	U D	>	-D,MALEGI
	U D	>	-D,MALGI
	U D	>	-D,MALT
	U D	>	-D,MALTKI
	U D	>	-D,MANA
	U D	>	-D,MANAGI
	U D	>	-D,MANI
	U D	>	-D,MANIGI
	U D	>	-D,MASSE
	U D	>	-D,MASSEGI
	U D	>	-D,MAT
	U D	>	-D,MATE
	U D	>	-D,MATEGA
	U D	>	-D,MATEGAGI
	U D	>	-D,MATEGI
	U D	>	-D,MATEKS
	U D	>	-D,MATEKSKI
	U D	>	-D,MATEL
	U D	>	-D,MATELE
	U D	>	-D,MATELEGI
	U D	>	-D,MATELGI
	U D	>	-D,MATELT
	U D	>	-D,MATELTKI
	U D	>	-D,MATENA
	U D	>	-D,MATENAGI
	U D	>	-D,MATENI
	U D	>	-D,MATENIGI
	U D	>	-D,MATES
	U D	>	-D,MATESKI
	U D	>	-D,MATESSE
	U D	>	-D,MATESSEGI
	U D	>	-D,MATEST
	U D	>	-D,MATESTKI
	U D	>	-D,MATETA
	U D	>	-D,MATETAGI
	U D	>	-D,MATKI
	U D	>	-D,MGI
	U D	>	-D,STI
	U D	>	-D,STIGI

# rule/flag 8541 (affects 9416 words, has 26 subrules):
flag t:
	A	>	MAKS
	A	>	MAKSKI
	A	>	MAS
	A	>	MASKI
	A	>	MAST
	A	>	MASTKI
	A	>	MATA
	A	>	MATAGI
	U D	>	-D,GA
	U D	>	-D,GAGI
	U D	>	-D,L
	U D	>	-D,LE
	U D	>	-D,LEGI
	U D	>	-D,LGI
	U D	>	-D,LT
	U D	>	-D,LTKI
	U D	>	-D,NA
	U D	>	-D,NAGI
	U D	>	-D,NI
	U D	>	-D,NIGI
	U D	>	-D,SSE
	U D	>	-D,SSEGI
	U D	>	-D,ST
	U D	>	-D,STKI
	[AI] N E	>	-NE,SSE
	[AI] N E	>	-NE,SSEGI

# rule/flag 8542 (affects 16252 words, has 114 subrules):
flag u:
	E	>	B
	E	>	BKI
	E	>	DKI
	I	>	GI
	T	>	I
	T	>	IGI
	K	>	KI
	E	>	KS
	E	>	KSID
	E	>	KSIDKI
	E	>	KSIME
	E	>	KSIMEGI
	E	>	KSIN
	E	>	KSINGI
	E	>	KSITE
	E	>	KSITEGI
	E	>	KSKI
	E	>	ME
	E	>	MEGI
	A	>	MINE
	A	>	MINEGI
	A	>	MISSE
	A	>	MISSEGI
	A	>	MIST
	A	>	MISTKI
	E	>	N
	E	>	NGI
	A	>	SIME
	A	>	SIMEGI
	A	>	SIN
	A	>	SINGI
	A	>	SITE
	A	>	SITEGI
	E	>	TE
	E	>	TEGI
	S	>	TKI
	U D	>	-D,IM
	U D	>	-D,IMA
	U D	>	-D,IMAD
	U D	>	-D,IMADKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAGA
	U D	>	-D,IMAGAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAID
	U D	>	-D,IMAIDKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAIGA
	U D	>	-D,IMAIGAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAIKS
	U D	>	-D,IMAIKSKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAIL
	U D	>	-D,IMAILE
	U D	>	-D,IMAILEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAILGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAILT
	U D	>	-D,IMAILTKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAINA
	U D	>	-D,IMAINAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAINI
	U D	>	-D,IMAINIGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAIS
	U D	>	-D,IMAISKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAISSE
	U D	>	-D,IMAISSEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAIST
	U D	>	-D,IMAISTKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAITA
	U D	>	-D,IMAITAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAKS
	U D	>	-D,IMAKSKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAL
	U D	>	-D,IMALE
	U D	>	-D,IMALEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMALGI
	U D	>	-D,IMALT
	U D	>	-D,IMALTKI
	U D	>	-D,IMANA
	U D	>	-D,IMANAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMANI
	U D	>	-D,IMANIGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAS
	U D	>	-D,IMASKI
	U D	>	-D,IMASSE
	U D	>	-D,IMASSEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMAST
	U D	>	-D,IMASTKI
	U D	>	-D,IMAT
	U D	>	-D,IMATA
	U D	>	-D,IMATAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATE
	U D	>	-D,IMATEGA
	U D	>	-D,IMATEGAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATEKS
	U D	>	-D,IMATEKSKI
	U D	>	-D,IMATEL
	U D	>	-D,IMATELE
	U D	>	-D,IMATELEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATELGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATELT
	U D	>	-D,IMATELTKI
	U D	>	-D,IMATENA
	U D	>	-D,IMATENAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATENI
	U D	>	-D,IMATENIGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATES
	U D	>	-D,IMATESKI
	U D	>	-D,IMATESSE
	U D	>	-D,IMATESSEGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATEST
	U D	>	-D,IMATESTKI
	U D	>	-D,IMATETA
	U D	>	-D,IMATETAGI
	U D	>	-D,IMATKI
	U D	>	-D,IMGI

# rule/flag 12638 (affects 7016 words, has 20 subrules):
flag v:
	A	>	GA
	A	>	GAGI
	A	>	L
	A	>	LE
	A	>	LEGI
	A	>	LGI
	A	>	LT
	A	>	LTKI
	A	>	NA
	A	>	NAGI
	A	>	NI
	A	>	NIGI
	A	>	SSE
	A	>	SSEGI
	A	>	ST
	A	>	STKI
	U D	>	-D,KSID
	U D	>	-D,KSIME
	U D	>	-D,KSIN
	U D	>	-D,KSITE

# rule/flag 12639 (affects 14377 words, has 222 subrules):
flag w:
	I	>	B
	I	>	BKI
	T	>	E
	T	>	EGI
	K	>	KE
	[AK]	>	KEGI
	A	>	KENEGI
	A	>	KESED
	A	>	KESEDKI
	A	>	KESEGA
	A	>	KESEGAGI
	A	>	KESEGI
	A	>	KESEKS
	A	>	KESEKSKI
	A	>	KESEL
	A	>	KESELE
	A	>	KESELEGI
	A	>	KESELGI
	A	>	KESELT
	A	>	KESELTKI
	A	>	KESENA
	A	>	KESENAGI
	A	>	KESENI
	A	>	KESENIGI
	A	>	KESES
	A	>	KESESKI
	A	>	KESESSE
	A	>	KESESSEGI
	A	>	KESEST
	A	>	KESESTKI
	A	>	KESETA
	A	>	KESETAGI
	A	>	KESI
	A	>	KESIGA
	A	>	KESIGAGI
	A	>	KESIGI
	A	>	KESIKS
	A	>	KESIKSKI
	A	>	KESIL
	A	>	KESILE
	A	>	KESILEGI
	A	>	KESILGI
	A	>	KESILT
	A	>	KESILTKI
	A	>	KESINA
	A	>	KESINAGI
	A	>	KESINI
	A	>	KESINIGI
	A	>	KESIS
	A	>	KESISKI
	A	>	KESISSE
	A	>	KESISSEGI
	A	>	KESIST
	A	>	KESISTKI
	A	>	KESITA
	A	>	KESITAGI
	A	>	KESSE
	A	>	KESSEGI
	A	>	KEST
	A	>	KESTE
	A	>	KESTEGA
	A	>	KESTEGAGI
	A	>	KESTEGI
	A	>	KESTEKS
	A	>	KESTEKSKI
	A	>	KESTEL
	A	>	KESTELE
	A	>	KESTELEGI
	A	>	KESTELGI
	A	>	KESTELT
	A	>	KESTELTKI
	A	>	KESTENA
	A	>	KESTENAGI
	A	>	KESTENI
	A	>	KESTENIGI
	A	>	KESTES
	A	>	KESTESKI
	A	>	KESTESSE
	A	>	KESTESSEGI
	A	>	KESTEST
	A	>	KESTESTKI
	A	>	KESTETA
	A	>	KESTETAGI
	A	>	KESTKI
	I	>	KSID
	I	>	KSIDKI
	I	>	KSIME
	I	>	KSIMEGI
	I	>	KSIN
	I	>	KSINGI
	I	>	KSITE
	I	>	KSITEGI
	I	>	KSKI
	E	>	MA
	E	>	MAGI
	E	>	MAKS
	E	>	MAKSKI
	E	>	MAS
	E	>	MASKI
	E	>	MAST
	E	>	MASTKI
	E	>	MATA
	E	>	MATAGI
	E	>	MINE
	E	>	MINEGI
	E	>	MISSE
	E	>	MISSEGI
	E	>	MIST
	E	>	MISTKI
	S	>	T
	U	>	TA
	U	>	TAGI
	U	>	TAGU
	U	>	TAGUGI
	U	>	TAKS
	U	>	TAKSE
	U	>	TAKSEGI
	U	>	TAKSKI
	U	>	TAMA
	U	>	TAMAGI
	U	>	TAV
	U	>	TAVGI
	U	>	TI
	U	>	TIGI
	M	>	US
	M	>	USKI
	M	>	USSE
	M	>	USSEGI
	M	>	UST
	M	>	USTKI
	E	>	V
	I	>	VAD
	I	>	VADKI
	E	>	VGI
	E	>	VUS
	E	>	VUSKI
	E	>	VUSSE
	E	>	VUSSEGI
	E	>	VUST
	E	>	VUSTKI
	U D	>	-D,KE
	U D	>	-D,KEGI
	U D	>	-D,KENE
	U D	>	-D,KENEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESE
	U D	>	-D,KESED
	U D	>	-D,KESEDKI
	U D	>	-D,KESEGA
	U D	>	-D,KESEGAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESEKS
	U D	>	-D,KESEKSKI
	U D	>	-D,KESEL
	U D	>	-D,KESELE
	U D	>	-D,KESELEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESELGI
	U D	>	-D,KESELT
	U D	>	-D,KESELTKI
	U D	>	-D,KESENA
	U D	>	-D,KESENAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESENI
	U D	>	-D,KESENIGI
	U D	>	-D,KESES
	U D	>	-D,KESESKI
	U D	>	-D,KESESSE
	U D	>	-D,KESESSEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESEST
	U D	>	-D,KESESTKI
	U D	>	-D,KESETA
	U D	>	-D,KESETAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESI
	U D	>	-D,KESIGA
	U D	>	-D,KESIGAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESIGI
	U D	>	-D,KESIKS
	U D	>	-D,KESIKSKI
	U D	>	-D,KESIL
	U D	>	-D,KESILE
	U D	>	-D,KESILEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESILGI
	U D	>	-D,KESILT
	U D	>	-D,KESILTKI
	U D	>	-D,KESINA
	U D	>	-D,KESINAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESINI
	U D	>	-D,KESINIGI
	U D	>	-D,KESIS
	U D	>	-D,KESISKI
	U D	>	-D,KESISSE
	U D	>	-D,KESISSEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESIST
	U D	>	-D,KESISTKI
	U D	>	-D,KESITA
	U D	>	-D,KESITAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESSE
	U D	>	-D,KESSEGI
	U D	>	-D,KEST
	U D	>	-D,KESTE
	U D	>	-D,KESTEGA
	U D	>	-D,KESTEGAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTEKS
	U D	>	-D,KESTEKSKI
	U D	>	-D,KESTEL
	U D	>	-D,KESTELE
	U D	>	-D,KESTELEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTELGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTELT
	U D	>	-D,KESTELTKI
	U D	>	-D,KESTENA
	U D	>	-D,KESTENAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTENI
	U D	>	-D,KESTENIGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTES
	U D	>	-D,KESTESKI
	U D	>	-D,KESTESSE
	U D	>	-D,KESTESSEGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTEST
	U D	>	-D,KESTESTKI
	U D	>	-D,KESTETA
	U D	>	-D,KESTETAGI
	U D	>	-D,KESTKI
