ubuntu.slaves.black/4/packages/ispell-et/src/latin-1/estonian.dict
algmine/aqt
alustus/arsuw
amulett/asuw
aplus/arsuw
arenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
arvuline/aqrt
asteek/u
auruvus/arsuw
broominud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
dekolteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
desinfitseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
distsiplineeritus/arsuw
eduline/aqrt
eksmatrikuleerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
elevant/asuw
eredus/arsuw
eritlenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
favoriit/asuw
fraasitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
genereerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
gratuleerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hakkinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
halastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
heegellus/arsuw
heidutus/arsuw
helkinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
herilane/aqt
hilinenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
huku/aw
humoristlik/auw
huuljus/arsuw
hõilanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hüvastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
hüüelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
identifitseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ilmestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
informeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
irdunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
istandus/arsuw
joodeldanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
joomine/aqt
jorisenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
jumalus/arsuw
jäletsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kaarutus/arsuw
kabestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kabestunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kahvatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kalambuuritsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
karjatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
karminenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
keeljus/arsuw
kerglane/aqrt
kibestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kibestumus/arsuw
kibrastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kiti/arsuw
kiuelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
klaasinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
klammerdunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
klõbistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
koksistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kolksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
komplitseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
koostunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kopsutus/arsuw
korbakus/arsuw
koristanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kraaksatus/arsuw
krõksutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
krõpsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kulunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kuramus/arsuw
kuulelik/auw
kähardanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kähmelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõhkle/asuw
kõlvanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
kõnniskelnud/abcdfghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
küllastunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
laaberdis/arsuw
laekunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
laga/abcfhikpvwy
laksinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
leelekus/arsuw
leevendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
leplik/auw
linnaline/aqrt
lipnenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lipsatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lirtsunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lustlik/auw
lähenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lätistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lõpnud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
lööberdis/arsuw
magamatus/arsuw
masendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
massiline/aqrt
moment/asuw
mustenenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mässanud/abcefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
mõlemiti/u
mõnusus/arsuw
niiksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nikastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
niuksunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nokaudi/arsuw
nui/u
närvastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
nööpinud/adfijklmnopqrstuvwyz
orienteerunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
ornament/asuw
osanud/acijklmnopqrstuvwyz
osseet/asuw
paraaditsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pihka/aqrstu
piinelnud/acdijklmnopqrstuvwyz
piisutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
pimestus/arsuw
pisendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
prantsti/u
pruulinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
prõksatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
prügistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
purjestus/arsuw
põli/u
põrka/aqrstu
rahustunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rahvastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
reorganiseerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
retsiteerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
revüülik/auw
rullinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rullunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
rögastanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
saamatus/arsuw
sallivus/arsuw
seondanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
seotis/arsuw
separeerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
simuleerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sooritanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
soovinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
stimuleerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
subsideerinud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sulundanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
särtsutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
sütitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
taidlus/arsuw
taimestunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
talbjus/arsuw
tarvitsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tolmutunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tooninud/acdefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
toonud/aceijklmnopqrstuvwyz
toorestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tormutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
täiustunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tänitanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
tõrelus/arsuw
töökus/arsuw
töötanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vaarikane/aqrt
vagonett/asuw
valvakus/arsuw
vastutanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
veestanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
vigurdunud/acefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
viisik/u
voorestik/auw
vägivallatsenud/abcefhijklmnopqrstuvwyz
välgatanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võbistanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
võimendanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
õhk/u
õnardanud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
õpetlane/aqt
üranud/abcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwyz
